Tennessee, session 114, HB1266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1403, is amended by deleting
the language "A metals recycling facility shall post in a conspicuous location a notice that is
readily visible to all persons selling materials to the facility." and substituting:
A metals recycling facility shall post in a conspicuous location at each public entrance to
the facility a notice that is readily visible to all persons selling materials to the facility.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1266
002790
- 1 -